District of Columbia statutes.
7-2851

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Department of Health” means the District of Columbia Department of Health.

(2)

“Engineered sharps injury protection” means a physical attribute built into a sharp that effectively reduces the risk of an exposure incident by a mechanism such as a barrier creation, blunting, encapsulation, withdrawal, retraction, destruction, or other effective mechanisms.

(3)

“Exposure incident” means contact with blood or other potentially infectious materials that results from a sharp injury.

(4)

“Person” means any individual, corporation, or other such entity that sells, distributes, uses, or possesses sharps.

(5)

“Sharp” means any medical device that is or contains a needle.

(6)

“Sharps injury” means any injury caused by a sharp, including cuts, abrasions, or needlesticks.

History

Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-272, § 2, 48 DCR 1633